Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,154
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Student Online Personal Protection Act:

(1) Covered information means personally identifiable information or material or information that is linked to personally identifiable information or material in any medium or format that is not publicly available and is any of the following:

(a) Created or gathered by or provided to an operator by a student, or the student's parent or legal guardian, in the course of the student's, parent's, or legal guardian's use of the operator's site, service, or application for elementary, middle, or high school purposes;

(b) Created by or provided to an operator by an employee or agent of an elementary school, middle school, high school, or school district for elementary, middle, or high school purposes; or

(c) Gathered by an operator through the operation of its site, service, or application for elementary, middle, or high school purposes and personally identifies a student, including, but not limited to, information in the student's educational record or electronic mail, first and last name, home address, telephone number, electronic mail address, or other information that allows physical or online contact, discipline records, test results, special education data, juvenile dependency records, grades, evaluations, criminal records, medical records, health records, social security number, biometric information, disabilities, socioeconomic information, food purchases, political affiliations, religious information, text messages, documents, student identifiers, search activity, photos, voice recordings, or geolocation information;

(2) Interactive computer service has the definition found in 47 U.S.C. 230, as such section existed on January 1, 2017;

(3) Elementary, middle, or high school purposes means purposes that are directed by or that customarily take place at the direction of an elementary school, a middle school, a high school, a teacher, or a school district or that aid in the administration of school activities, including, but not limited to, instruction in the classroom or at home, administrative activities, collaboration between students, school personnel, or parents, and other purposes that are pursued for the use and benefit of the school or school district;

(4) Operator means, to the extent it is operating in this capacity, the operator of an Internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application with actual knowledge that the site, service, or application is used primarily for elementary, middle, or high school purposes and was designed and marketed for elementary, middle, or high school purposes. This term does not include Internet websites, online services, online applications, or mobile applications operated by a postsecondary institution with a physical presence in Nebraska; and

(5) Targeted advertising means presenting advertisements to a student where the advertisement is selected based on information obtained or inferred over time from that student's online behavior, usage of applications, or covered information. It does not include advertising to a student at an online location based upon that student's current visit to that location, or in response to that student’s request for information or feedback, without the retention of that student's online activities or requests over time for the purpose of targeting subsequent advertisements.

Laws 2017, LB512, § 2.